Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-9] Cooperative agreements with other
government agencies. (a) The authority may:

(1) Obtain the aid and cooperation of other
government agencies in the planning, construction, and operation of public
housing projects and enter into agreements and arrangements as it deems
advisable to obtain aid and cooperation;

(2) Arrange or enter into agreements with any
government agency for the acquisition by that agency of property, options, or
property rights; for the furnishing, installing, opening, or closing of
streets, roads, alleys, sidewalks, or other places; for the furnishing of
property, services, parks, sewage, water, and other facilities in connection
with public housing projects; or for the changing of the map of a political
subdivision or the planning, replanning, zoning, or rezoning of any part of a
political subdivision;

(3) Procure insurance or guarantees from any
government agency for the payment of any debts or parts thereof incurred by the
authority, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance; and

(4) Agree to make payments to the state or county
government, if the government is authorized to accept payments, as the
authority deems consistent with the maintenance of the character of public
housing projects or the purposes of this chapter.

(b) For the purpose of aiding and cooperating
in the planning, construction, and operation of public housing projects located
within their respective territorial boundaries, the state or county government,
upon those terms, with or without consideration, as it determines, may:

(1) Dedicate, grant, sell, convey, or lease any of
its property, or grant easements, licenses, or any other rights or privileges
therein to the authority or to the federal government;

(2) To the extent that it is within the scope of each
of their respective functions:

(A) Cause the services customarily provided
by each of them to be rendered for the benefit of public housing projects and
the occupants thereof;

(B) Provide and maintain parks; and sewage,
water, lights, and other facilities adjacent to or in connection with public
housing projects;

(C) Open, close, pave, install, or change the
grade of streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, or other related
facilities; and

(D) Change the map of a political subdivision
or plan, replan, zone, or rezone any part of a political subdivision;

(3) Enter into agreements with the authority with
respect to the exercise of the State or county's powers relating to the repair,
closing, or demolition of unsafe, unsanitary, or unfit dwellings;

(4) Employ, notwithstanding any other law as to what
constitutes legal investments, any available funds belonging to them or within
their control, including funds derived from the sale or furnishing of property
or facilities to the authority, in the purchase of the bonds or other
obligations of the authority, and exercise all the rights of any holder of the
bonds or other obligations;

(5) Do any and all things necessary or convenient to
aid and cooperate in the planning, undertaking, and construction of public
housing projects; and

(6) Enter into contracts with the authority or the
federal government for any period agreeing to exercise any of the powers
conferred by this subsection or to take any other action in aid of public housing
projects.

In connection with the exercise of the powers
conferred by this subsection, any political subdivision may incur the entire
expense of any public improvements located within its territorial boundaries
without assessment against abutting property owners.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in
the planning, construction, and operation of public housing projects, the
department of land and natural resources, the Hawaiian homes commission, and
any other agency of the State having power to manage or dispose of its public
lands, with the approval of the governor and with or without consideration, may
grant, sell, convey, or lease for any period, any parts of such public lands,
without limit as to area, to the authority or to the federal government.

Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any
gift, grant, sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this section
may be made by the state or county government without appraisal, public notice,
advertisement, or public bidding.

If at any time title to, or possession of, any
public housing project is held by any government authorized by law to engage in
the development or administration of low-income housing or slum clearance
projects, any agreement made under this section relating to the project shall
inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by that government.

Insofar as this subsection is inconsistent with
the provisions of any other law, this subsection shall control.

(c) Any county in which a public housing
project is located or is about to be located may make donations or advances to
the authority in sums as the county in its discretion may determine. The
advances or donations shall be made for the purpose of aiding or cooperating in
the construction and operation of the public housing project. The authority,
when it has money available therefor, shall reimburse the county for all
advances made by way of a loan to it. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next